Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-921
Relationship to federal Fair Credit Reporting Act.

Nothing in the Privacy of Insurance Consumer Information Act shall be construed to modify, limit, or supersede the operation of 15 U.S.C. 1681 et seq., as such section existed on April 5, 2001, and no inference shall be drawn on the basis of the provisions of the act regarding whether information is transaction or experience information under 15 U.S.C. 1681a, as such section existed on April 5, 2001.

Laws 2001, LB 52, § 21.